District of Columbia statutes.
9-202.10

Required notice of approval to affected property owners.

Except in the circumstances enumerated in § 9-202.05(1) through (6), following enactment of legislation ordering the closing of all or part of a street or alley, the Mayor shall give written notice to the owners of the property on both sides of the block(s) of the street to be closed or which abuts that entire alley, that the legislation has been approved by the Council and signed by the Mayor. This notice shall also indicate that any written objection by an interested party aggrieved by the closing must state how the person is aggrieved by the closing and must be filed with the Mayor within 30 days of the mailing of the notice.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 210, 30 DCR 148
This section is referenced in § 9-202.11.
1981 Ed., § 7-430.